West Virginia, session 2026, HB4796.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 13. central reception center and emergency resource homes. §49-13-1. Definitions. "Central Reception Center" means a dedicated facility providing short-term, temporary supervision, assessment, and support services to children awaiting placement."Emergency Resource Homes" means foster homes designated to provide emergency overnight care to children who do not yet have permanent placements."Behavioral Stabilization Services" means crisis intervention, de-escalation, and clinical support for children experiencing mental or behavioral health crises. §49-13-2. Central Reception Center establishment. (a) The West Virginia Department of Human Services shall contract with at least two central reception centers to serve as a short term arrangement for children awaiting foster placement. (b) The central reception center shall operate 24 hours per day and be open every day of the year and provide:(1) Supervised care and temporary shelter for children who have been disrupted from placements;(2) Behavioral assessment and stabilization services;(3) Case coordination with child welfare professionals and agencies to identify appropriate foster placements; and(4) Educational continuity and medical or therapeutic support as needed. (c) The central reception center shall be licensed as a residential treatment facility.(d) A child staying at the central reception center may not remain more than 72 hours but shall be placed in an emergency resource home or other suitable foster home by the end of each 72-hour period. §49-13-3. Emergency Resource Home recruitment and expansion. (a) The Department of Human Services shall in conjunction with child placing agencies expand recruitment of emergency resource homes to ensure an adequate number of emergency foster placements across the state. (b) Emergency resource home parents shall be:(1) Provided with specialized training in trauma-informed care and crisis intervention;(2) Offered financial incentives to ensure homes remain open and available; and(3) Supported by 24/7 crisis response teams for immediate intervention if needed. (c) The Department of Human Services shall actively recruit emergency resource homes in high-need areas and prioritize homes for adolescents, justice-involved youth, and children with special needs. §49-13-4. Reports. The Department of Human Services shall submit an annual report to the LegislativeOversight Commission on Health and Human Resources by December 1 concerning; (1) The number of children served;(2) Placement success rates;(3) The effectiveness of behavioral stabilization interventions; and(4) The progress on emergency resource homes recruitment and retention.